Hawaii statutes.
[§447-3.5] Educational requirements for
intra-oral block anesthesia. (a) The applicant for certification to
administer intra-oral block anesthesia shall show proof that the applicant
successfully completed a course of study that shall include the following
categories of intra-oral infiltration local anesthesia and intra-oral block
anesthesia:

(1) Maxillary mandibular infiltration anesthesia;

(2) Long buccal nerve block anesthesia;

(3) Mental nerve block;

(4) Inferior alveolar/lingual nerve block;

(5) Incisive nerve block;

(6) Posterior superior alveolar nerve block;

(7) Middle superior alveolar nerve block;

(8) Anterior superior alveolar nerve block;

(9) Nasopalatine (incisive canal) nerve block; and

(10) Greater (anterior) palatine nerve block.

(b) A course of study shall also include
didactic studies and clinical experience, and for intra-oral block anesthesia
categories in subsection (a)(1) to (10), at least thirty-nine hours, and a
minimum of fifty successful injections of which ten shall be in intra-oral
block in subsection (a)(4) and five in intra-oral block in subsection (a)(6).

(c) The curriculum of the course of study
shall include as follows:

(1) Cardiopulmonary resuscitation certification;

(2) Medical history evaluation procedures;

(3) Physical evaluation procedures;

(4) Anatomy of head, neck, and oral cavity as it
relates to administering local anesthetic agents;

(5) Pharmacology of local anesthetics and
vasoconstrictors;

(6) Indications and contraindications for
administration of local anesthetics;

(7) Prevention, diagnosis, and management of medical
emergency;

(8) Recognition and management of post-injection
complications and management of reactions to injections;

(9) Medical and legal management complications;

(10) Selection and preparation of the armamenteria and
recordkeeping for administering various local anesthetics;

(11) Methods of administering local anesthetics with
emphasis on technique, which includes aspiration and slow injection, in
addition to minimum effective dosage; and

(12) Proper infection control techniques with regard
to local anesthesia and the proper disposal of sharps.

(d) As part of the course of study, the
applicant or licensed dental hygienist shall be required to pass an examination
to determine if the applicant or licensed dental hygienist has acquired the
necessary knowledge and clinical proficiency to administer intra-oral block
anesthesia.

(e) The board of dental examiners may adopt
rules pursuant to chapter 91, relating to the education and certification of
dental hygienists to administer intra-oral block anesthesia. [L 1999, c 97, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next